Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.502

Medical cannabis research.

(1) The University of Washington and Washington State University may conduct scientific research on the efficacy and safety of administering cannabis as part of medical treatment. As part of this research, the University of Washington and Washington State University may develop and conduct studies to ascertain the general medical safety and efficacy of cannabis, and may develop medical guidelines for the appropriate administration and use of cannabis.

(2) The University of Washington and Washington State University may, in accordance with RCW 69.50.372, contract with cannabis research licensees to conduct research permitted under this section and RCW 69.50.372.

(3) The University of Washington and Washington State University may contract to conduct cannabis research with an entity licensed to conduct such research by a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "cannabis" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

[ 2022 c 16 s 26; 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1502; 2015 c 71 s 2; 2011 c 181 s 1002.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Findings—Intent—Effective dates—2015 2nd sp.s. c 4: See notes following RCW 69.50.334.